ro_RO.dic
aboliție/f
acantologie/f
accidentalitate/f
acefalostomie/f
acetoliză/f
acidorezistență/f
acribie/f
acromanție/f
actinografie/f
acumetrie/f
ademenire/F
adempțiune/f
adinamie/f
adresabilitate/f
aerofagie/f
aeromecanică/f
aerotriangulație/f
afixare/f
afumătoare/F
agalactie/f
agrafie/f
agroclimatologie/f
agronomie/f
albiciune/f
albineală/F
alcoolmetrie/f
algiditate/f
alienație/f
alipire/F
altimetrie/f
ambidextrie/f
amfetamină/f
amilodextrină/f
amirosire/F
ampicilină/f
anacronie/f
analgezie/f
androginie/f
anencefalie/f
angiocardiografie/f
anglomanie/f
anorexie/f
antifricțiune/f
antimălurire/F
antroponimie/f
apostie/f
arenduire/F
areometrie/f
arierație/f
arseniură/F
asiatistică/F
asiduitate/f
astronomie/f
audiografie/f
auire/F
autodubiță/f
automulțumire/F
autotomie/f
ațintire/F
balanografie/f
bejănărie/f
belire/F
bibliologie/f
biciuire/F
biogeografie/f
biotină/f
blegeală/F
bodogănire/F
bombănitură/F
botanografie/f
boșorogire/F
bromhidroză/f
bruftuluială/F
buchisire/F
bujdire/F
burlăcie/f
burlăcire/F
bușire/F
bâzâire/F
băloșire/F
bărbiereală/F
cafelire/F
calicenie/f
capabilitate/f
captură/F
cardiectazie/f
cartomanție/f
caterincă/F
cecidie/f
cercetășie/f
cercuire/F
chemoluminescență/f
chiciură/F
chiuită/f
cimilire/F
ciordeală/F
circumvalație/f
cleire/F
climatologie/f
clănțăire/F
coerciție/f
colcăire/F
colografie/f
completitudine/f
conductivitate/f
consubstanțialitate/f
contractură/F
convertografie/f
coronarografie/f
cosire/F
cosmofiziologie/f
crenologie/f
cristalomanție/f
crușire/F
cuminție/f
cuvenire/F
căldură/F
călibilitate/f
căscătură/F
dactiliomanție/f
decrepitație/f
demonomanie/f
depănătură/F
dermografie/f
desproprietărire/F
dezmiriștire/F
dezmopatie/f
dicloretilenă/f
discofilie/f
disritmicitate/f
dobândire/F
dromofobie/f
drămăluire/F
dârdâire/F
ebenisterie/f
ecometrie/f
efedrină/f
electroacupunctură/f
electroluminescență/f
electroterapie/f
elenire/F
embriologie/f
endocrinoterapie/f
entalpie/f
epinefrină/f
eritromicină/f
eterosferă/f
etnosociologie/f
exhaustivitate/f
extraneitate/f
febrilitate/f
fericianură/F
ferocitate/f
filigranologie/f
fitotehnie/f
fleșcăire/F
floculație/f
foniatrie/f
fotoconducție/f
fototopografie/f
foșcăire/F
frunzărime/f
fulguire/F
fâșâială/F
gabardină/f
gargarisire/F
gastrulație/f
geognozie/f
geroigienă/f
ghircă/F
giromanție/f
gnoză/f
gravitație/f
grohăitură/F
gâlgâire/F
hainire/F
halocromie/f
helmintologie/f
heterosexualitate/f
hidrometalurgie/f
hiperemotivitate/f
hipologie/f
histologie/f
hoinăreală/F
horticultură/f
huciuire/F
hârjonire/F
hămăială/F
identificație/f
ieruncă/F
ihtiologie/f
impaciență/f
implacabilitate/f
impunitate/f
inactivitate/f
incarcerație/f
incomutabilitate/f
indentare/f
inerență/f
inforenergetică/f
insițiune/f
intensiune/f
intranzitivitate/f
ireductibilitate/f
iscoditură/F
iveală/f
jecmăneală/F
jenilie/f
jugănire/F
lactoflavină/f
lecuță/f
legumire/F
lichenografie/f
licoare/F
literatură/F
locomoțiune/f
lâncezeală/f
lăptucă/F
magnezie/f
manometrie/f
matematică/F
maximafilie/f
metagalaxie/f
metapovestire/F
meteorobiologie/f
microbiologie/f
milostivire/F
mineralogie/f
mitografie/f
moară/F
monofobie/f
morfografie/f
mormorosire/F
mucezitură/F
muncitorime/f
mustuitură/F
mânecată/f
mânătură/F
mărire/F
neaccesibilitate/f
nechezătură/F
necrofagie/f
negociabilitate/f
nemurire/F
neopsihanaliză/f
nesinceritate/f
neînfricare/f
neștire/F
nonexistență/f
năclăire/F
năstăvire/F
obducție/f
obrântire/F
oecologie/f
ologire/F
omenime/f
onomanție/f
orbie/f
ordură/F
ortodontologie/f
osteologie/f
oștime/f
oțărire/F
paleontografie/f
panfobie/f
parafucsină/f
parvenire/F
patofiziologie/f
pedologie/f
perisabilitate/f
pervitină/f
picotire/F
pirobalistică/f
pironire/F
plasticitate/f
pleoșcăire/F
pluritonalitate/f
plămădeală/F
polcovnicie/f
polcă/F
politomie/f
pornitură/F
postelnicie/f
potricălire/F
pravoslavnicie/f
prejmă/f
prelugire/F
preștiință/f
pricinuire/F
pritoceală/F
profesorime/f
prorocitură/F
prosperitate/f
prozaicitate/f
prăjire/F
psihochirurgie/f
puericultură/f
puhoire/F
pângărire/F
păgubire/F
păgânătate/f
păsuială/F
radiocinematografie/f
radiumterapie/f
reademenire/F
reamușire/F
reautodepășire/F
reblodogorire/F
rebrăcuire/F
rebâjbâire/F
rebăsnire/F
recalescență/f
rechelboșire/F
reciobănire/F
reclintire/F
recodălbire/F
recorotire/F
recălăfătuire/F
redesclocire/F
redomesticire/F
reduruire/F
referotecă/F
reflectografie/f
refrăgezire/F
refățărire/F
regrohăire/F
regătire/F
rehorpăire/F
rehârșnire/F
rehărțuire/F
reiuire/F
rejuruire/F
relingușire/F
remangăluire/F
remiluire/F
remotroșire/F
remușluire/F
remăsluire/F
renomolire/F
renăzuire/F
reogoire/F
reologie/f
reovilire/F
repețire/F
repleznire/F
repoleire/F
repreaslăvire/F
reprilejire/F
reproțăpire/F
repușcărire/F
repărăginire/F
reredobândire/F
rereînflorire/F
rerâșnire/F
rerăsucire/F
rescotocire/F
restârnire/F
retitirire/F
retrocompatibilitate/f
retrăsnire/F
retămăduire/F
revecuire/F
revuvuire/F
rezbenguire/F
rezemătoare/F
rezuzăire/F
rezărire/F
reîmpletecire/F
reînavuțire/F
reîndoire/F
reîngrămădire/F
reînsoțire/F
reînvrednicire/F
reșeveruire/F
reșpăcluire/F
rețintire/F
risipire/F
robotehnică/f
rotunjitură/F
ruptoare/f
rândire/F
răcăluire/F
răsflocire/F
răvășeală/F
rățucă/F
saponificație/f
schimonositură/F
scopire/F
scriptură/F
scrupulozitate/f
scândurire/F
seară/F
selenologie/f
serită/f
sfințitură/F
sfărâmătură/F
siderografie/f
sincronicitate/f
sinăluire/F
smochinire/F
sociabilitate/f
socrire/F
somnoterapie/f
spectroscopie/f
sperietură/F
spuzire/F
statalitate/f
stereometrie/f
stihuire/F
stricnină/f
stropșeală/F
strămătură/F
stărețire/F
sucusiune/f
suire/F
surescitabilitate/f
sâsâire/F
sărcălire/F
talasografie/f
tebaină/f
teleenciclopedie/f
temperanță/f
temătură/F
termochimie/f
termosferă/f
tihneală/F
timie/f
tivitură/F
topofobie/f
transportarisire/F
tranzitivitate/f
tripsină/f
truficultură/F
tunică/F
tâlhărime/f
tândălire/F
târșâitură/F
tăpșire/F
umilire/F
unidimensionalitate/f
uscătură/F
uvologie/f
vasopresină/f
verbozitate/f
veșnicire/F
vibroterapie/f
vizibilitate/f
vomătură/F
vâjiitură/F
vălătuceală/F
xantocromie/f
zară/f
zbihuială/F
zdrențuire/F
zguduire/F
zoosemiotică/F
zootehnie/f
zvâcâire/F
zălogire/F
îmblăcire/F
împinsătură/F
împăinjenire/F
încolăceală/F
încăpăstrire/F
înfrățire/F
îngăduire/F
înrobire/F
întroienire/F
învăluială/F
înăcreală/f
școlărire/F
șirincă/F
șopotire/F
șoricărime/f
șpăruire/F
ștramporire/F
șușotire/F
țistuire/F
țârâială/F
